District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.86

Annual budget for the Office of Attorney General.

(a)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall prepare and submit to the Mayor, for inclusion in the annual budget of the District of Columbia under part D of subchapter IV of Chapter 2 of this title [§  1-204.41 et seq.], for the year, annual estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary for the operation of the Office of the Attorney General for the year. The Mayor shall make recommendations to the Council of the District of Columbia based on said submissions for the Council’s action pursuant to § 1-204.46 and § 1-206.03(c).

(b)

Amounts appropriated for the Office of the Attorney General shall be available solely for the operation of the office, and shall be paid to the Attorney General by the Mayor (acting through the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia) in such installments and at such times as the Attorney General requires.

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 106, 57 DCR 3012